District of Columbia statutes.
42-2812.12

Information reporting.

Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of the bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the Council.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-202, § 212
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2172(c), 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2172(c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).